Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 41.1 Grocery and Laundry Carts, Milk Cases, Egg Baskets, and Bakery Containers

11-41.1-1.
Definitions.

For the purpose of this chapter:

“Bakery container” means any permanent type of container which is used by a bakery, distributor, retailer, or food service establishment or the agent of any of them as a means to transport, store, or carry bakery products.

“Dairy case” means a wire or plastic container which holds 16 quarts or more of beverages and is used by distributors, retailers, or their agents as a means to transport, store, or carry dairy products.

“Dispenser case” means a plastic container which holds up to twenty-four (24) quarts of beverage and is used by distributors, retailers, or their agents as a means to transport, store, or carry dairy products for use in individual serving dispenser machines.

“Egg basket” means any permanent type of container which contains four (4) dozen or more shell eggs and is used by distributors, retailers, or their agents as a means to transport, store, or carry eggs.

“Laundry cart” means a basket which is mounted on wheels and used in a coin-operated laundry or drycleaning establishment by a customer or an attendant for the purpose of transporting laundry and laundry supplies.

“Name or mark” means any permanently affixed or permanently stamped name or mark which has been registered with the secretary of state pursuant to §

11-41.1-2

and is used for the purpose of identifying the registered owner of dairy cases, egg baskets, poultry boxes, bakery containers, or plastic bulk merchandise containers.

“Parking area” means a lot or other property provided by a retail establishment for the use of customers to park automobiles or other vehicles while doing business in that establishment.

“Plastic bulk merchandise container” means a plastic crate or shell used by a product producer, distributor, or retailer, or an agent of the product producer, distributor, or retailer as a means for the bulk transportation, storage or carrying of retail containers of milk, eggs, bakery, or bottled beverage products.

“Poultry box” means any permanent type of container which is used by processors, distributors, retailers, food service establishments, or their agents as a means to transport, store, or carry poultry.

“Registered owner” means any person, firm, corporation, or association registered with the secretary of state as the owner of an identifying name or mark described in subdivisions (6) and (10) of this section.

“Secretary” means the secretary of state.

“Shopping cart” means a basket which is mounted on wheels, or a similar device, generally used in a retail establishment by a customer for the purpose of transporting goods of any kind.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 395, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 158, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 139, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 282, § 1.

11-41.1-2.
Shopping carts, laundry carts, dairy cases, dispenser cases, egg baskets, bakery containers, poultry boxes, and plastic bulk merchandise containers.

Any person, firm, corporation, or association owning shopping carts, laundry carts, dairy cases, dispenser cases, egg baskets, bakery containers, poultry boxes, or plastic bulk merchandise containers may register with the secretary of state a description of the name or mark affixed or stamped on those cases, baskets, containers or boxes for identification purposes. If the secretary of state determines that the name or mark is not a duplication of any name or mark previously recorded in its files and does not so closely resemble any other recorded name or mark as to be misleading or deceiving, the secretary of state shall register and record the name or mark in a file to be provided and kept by the secretary of state for that purpose, along with the name and address of the registering owner of the name or mark. If the secretary of state determines that the name or mark so applied for is a duplication of any name or mark previously recorded by the secretary of state or so closely resembles a name or mark as to be misleading or deceiving, the application shall be denied and the applicant may register some other name or mark in the manner described in this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 395, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 158, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 139, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 282, § 1.

11-41.1-2.1.
Bakery containers — Designation of owners.

Any person, firm, corporation, or association engaged in receiving, packing, handling, or selling bakery products in permanent containers may, in order to designate the ownership of those containers or distinguish them from other similar containers, adopt, own, and use any name or mark and permanently affix that name or mark on any bakery container it owns, except a cardboard, fiberboard, or corrugated container.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 158, § 3.

11-41.1-3.
Illegal use of shopping carts, laundry carts, dairy cases, dispenser cases, egg baskets, bakery containers, poultry boxes, or plastic bulk merchandise containers.

No person, firm, corporation, or association other than the registered owner of the name or mark shall use for any purpose any container which is identified with or by any name or mark registered with the secretary of state as provided by §

11-41.1-2

. No person, firm, corporation, or association shall deface, obliterate, destroy, cover up, or otherwise remove or conceal any name or mark without the written consent of the registered owner.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 395, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 158, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 139, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 282, § 1.

11-41.1-4.
Possession of shopping carts, laundry carts, dairy cases, dispenser cases, egg baskets, bakery containers, poultry boxes, orplastic bulk merchandise containers.

Any person who is in possession of any shopping cart, laundry cart, dairy case, dispenser case, egg basket, bakery container, poultry box, or plastic bulk merchandise container with a registered name or mark shall be presumed to be in possession of stolen property and shall be guilty of larceny and punished as provided in §

11-41-5

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 395, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 158, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 139, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 282, § 1.

11-41.1-5.
Transportation of shopping carts, dairy cases, dispenser cases, egg baskets, bakery containers, poultry boxes, and plastic bulk merchandise containers — Bill of lading.

It shall be unlawful for any common carrier or private carrier for hire, except those engaged in the transporting of dairy products, eggs, poultry, or bakery products to and from farms or bakeries where they are produced, to receive or transport any container marked with a registered name or mark unless the carrier has in his or her possession a bill of lading or invoice for the container.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 395, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 158, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 139, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 282, § 1.

11-41.1-6.
Unlawful removal of shopping carts, dairy cases, dispenser cases, egg baskets, bakery containers, and plastic bulk merchandise containers.

It is a violation of this chapter for any person not in lawful possession of a shopping cart, dairy case, dispenser case, egg basket, bakery container, or plastic bulk merchandise container to remove a shopping cart or dairy case or dispenser case or egg basket or bakery container or plastic bulk merchandise container from the premises, parking area, or any other area of any retail establishment, or from any dairy or bakery delivery vehicle, if:

The shopping cart, dairy case, bakery container, dispenser case, egg basket or plastic bulk merchandise container is marked on at least two (2) sides with a registered name or mark; and

A notice to the public, warning that use by any person other than the registered owner is punishable by law, is visibly displayed on the dairy case.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 395, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 158, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 139, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 282, § 1.

11-41.1-7.
Egg baskets — Designation of owner.

Any person, firm, corporation, or association engaged in receiving, packing, handling, or selling eggs in permanent baskets which contain four (4) dozen or more shell eggs may adopt, own, and use any name or mark and permanently affix or stamp that name or mark on any egg basket, except cardboard, fiberboard, or corrugated containers, owned by that person, firm, corporation, or association, in order to designate the ownership of those baskets or distinguish them from other similar baskets.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 395, § 1.

11-41.1-8.
Poultry boxes, designation of owners.

Any person, firm, corporation, or association engaged in receiving, packing, handling, or selling poultry in permanent boxes may adopt, own, and use any name or mark and permanently affix or stamp that name or mark on any poultry box, except cardboard, fiberboard, or wood containers, owned by the person, firm, corporation, or association, in order to designate the ownership of those boxes or distinguish them from other similar boxes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 395, § 1.

11-41.1-9.
Unlawful removal of shopping carts, dairy cases, dispenser cases, egg baskets, poultry boxes, bakery containers, and plastic bulk or merchandise containers.

It is a violation of this chapter for any person not in lawful possession of a shopping cart or dairy case or dispenser case or egg basket or poultry box or bakery container, or plastic bulk merchandise container to remove an egg basket, poultry box, or plastic bulk merchandise container from the premises, parking area or any other area of any processor, distributor, retailer, or food service establishment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 395, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 139, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 282, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 475, § 1.

11-41.1-10.
Illegal use of shopping carts, laundry carts, dairy cases, dispenser cases, egg baskets, bakery containers and plastic bulk merchandise containers.

It is a violation of this chapter:

To remove any shopping cart, laundry cart, dairy case, dispenser case, egg basket, bakery container, or plastic bulk merchandise container from the premises or parking area of a retail establishment with intent to temporarily or permanently deprive the owner of the cart, dairy case, dispenser case, egg basket, bakery container, or plastic bulk merchandise container or the retailer of possession of the cart, dairy case, dispenser case, egg basket, bakery container, or plastic bulk merchandise container;

To remove a shopping cart, laundry cart, dairy case, dispenser case, egg basket, bakery container, or plastic bulk merchandise container without written authorization, from its owner or from the premises or parking area of any retail establishment;

To remove, obliterate, or alter any serial number or sign affixed to a shopping cart, laundry cart, dairy case, dispenser case, egg basket, bakery container, or plastic bulk merchandise container.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 395, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 139, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 282, § 1.

11-41.1-11.
Deposits.

The requiring, taking, or accepting of any deposit upon delivery of any dairy case, egg basket, poultry box, shopping cart, laundry cart, bakery container, dispenser case, or plastic bulk merchandise container shall not be deemed a sale of the case, basket, box, cart, or container, optional or otherwise.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 395, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 158, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 139, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 282, § 1.

11-41.1-12.
Penalty.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter is guilty of larceny, punishable as provided in §

11-41-5

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 395, § 1.

11-41.1-13.
Scope of chapter.

This chapter shall not apply to the owner of a shopping cart or laundry cart, or dairy case or egg basket or poultry box, or bakery container, dispenser case, or plastic bulk merchandise container or to a retailer, or to their agents or employees, or to a customer who has written consent from the owner of a shopping cart, laundry cart, dairy case, dispenser case, egg basket, or poultry box, or bakery container or plastic bulk merchandise container or from a retailer, to possess the cart, case, basket, box bakery container, or plastic bulk merchandise container or to remove it from the premises or the parking area of the retail establishment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 395, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 158, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 139, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 282, § 1.

11-41.1-14.
Purchase of shopping carts, dairy cases, dispenser cases, egg baskets, bakery containers or plastic bulk merchandise containers for recycling, shredding, or destruction — Verification of seller’s identity — Proof of ownership record.

Any person or entity purchasing shopping carts, dairy cases, dispenser cases, egg baskets, bakery containers or plastic bulk merchandise containers, who is in the business of recycling, shredding, or destruction of shopping carts, dairy cases, dispenser cases, egg baskets, bakery containers or plastic bulk merchandise containers shall obtain a proof of ownership record from a person selling five (5) or more shopping carts, dairy cases, dispenser cases, egg baskets, bakery containers or plastic bulk merchandise containers that shows that the person selling the carts, cases, baskets, or containers has lawful possession or ownership of the carts, cases, baskets, or containers, and shall also verify the seller’s identity by a driver’s license or other government-issued photo identification. The proof of ownership record shall include all of the following information:

The name, address, telephone number, and signature of the seller or the seller’s authorized representative.

The name and address of the buyer or consignee if not sold.

A description of the product including number of units.

The date of the transaction.

The information required to be collected by this section shall be kept for one year from the date of purchase or delivery, whichever is later.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 139, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 282, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 475, § 1.